Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 20

Interlocal Cooperation Act

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

25-20-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Interlocal Cooperation Act”.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 430, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-902.

25-20-102. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to permit local governmental units to make the most efficient use of their powers by enabling them to cooperate with other localities on a basis of mutual advantage and thereby to provide services and facilities in a manner and pursuant to forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population, and other factors influencing the needs and development of local communities.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 430, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-901.

25-20-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Public agency” means any:

School district;

Political subdivision of this state;

Agency of the state government or of the United States;

Political subdivision of another state;

Water district created under the provisions of The Regional Water Distribution District Act, § 14-116-101 et seq.;

Governing body of a municipal electric utility as defined in § 25-20-402; and

Fire department organized under the laws of this state if the fire department:

Offers fire protection services to unincorporated areas; and

Has received approval by its quorum court for participation in an interlocal cooperation agreement;

“Retail customer” means a person other than a municipality, improvement district, or other entity that sells and distributes water subject to regulation by the Department of Health who:

Maintains a service account with a public body formed under the Consolidated Waterworks Authorization Act, § 25-20-301 et seq., for the provision of water to a person or the occupants of a single-family dwelling, multi-tenant dwelling, business premises, or government facility; and

Is not explicitly permitted to resell potable water to another person;

“State” means a state of the United States and the District of Columbia;

“Storm water system” means all or any portion of the collective facilities and parts designed, organized, and implemented for the collection, storage, transmission, and disposition of excess storm water runoff in its entirety, or any integral parts thereof, that is formed under the authority of state law and includes without limitation inlets, street gutters, roadway gutters, roadside ditches, channels, swales, above-ground drain pipes, underground drain pipes, natural waterways, conduits, and water impoundments;

“Surplus water” means water available for distribution or sale aside from water necessarily required of the public body for distribution to its existing retail customers;

“Wastewater system” means a wastewater and collection system formed under state law that includes without limitation land, mains, interceptors, collector lines, manholes, force mains, valves, pumping stations, pumps, treatment and pretreatment plants and units thereof, other real and personal property, buildings, structures, other improvements, and facilities as necessary or advisable for the proper and efficient operation of the wastewater system; and

“Water system” means and includes a waterworks and distribution system in its entirety, or any integral parts thereof, which is formed under state law and includes without limitation land, mains, pipelines, hydrants, meters, valves, standpipes, storage tanks, storage basins, pumping tanks, intakes, wells, clear water wells, impounding reservoirs, lakes, watercourses, pumps, purification plants and units thereof, filtration plants and units thereof, as well as all other real and personal property, buildings, structures, and other improvements or facilities as necessary or advisable for the proper and efficient operation of the water system.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted (2) and redesignated former (2) as (3); and added (4) through (6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 392 deleted the former (2)(A) designation following “or other entity that”; redesignated former (2)(B) and (2)(C) as (2)(A) and (2)(B); added “who” following “Department of Health” in the introductory language of (2); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 613 added the definition for “Storm water system”.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 430, § 3; 1973, No. 415, § 1; 1975, No. 208, § 4; 1983, No. 180, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-903; Acts 2003, No. 366, § 2; 2017, No. 711, § 2; 2019, No. 392, § 7; 2019, No. 613, § 1.

25-20-104. Agreements for joint or cooperative action — Authority to make — Requirements generally.

Any governmental powers, privileges, or authority exercised or capable of exercise by a public agency of this state alone may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of this state which has the same powers, privileges, or authority under the law and jointly with any public agency of any other state of the United States which has the same powers, privileges, or authority, but only to the extent that laws of the other state or of the United States permit the joint exercise or enjoyment.

Any two (2) or more public agencies may enter into agreements with one another for joint cooperative action pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Appropriate action by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise pursuant to law of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies shall be necessary before the agreement may enter into force.

Any agreement for joint or cooperative action shall specify the following:

Its duration;

The precise organization, composition, and nature of any separate legal or administrative entity created thereby, together with the powers delegated to it, provided that the entity may be legally created;

Its purposes;

The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;

The permissible methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon the partial or complete termination; and

Any other necessary and proper matters.

In the event that the agreement does not establish a separate legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, in addition to the items enumerated in subdivisions (c)(1) and (c)(3)-(6) of this section, the agreement shall contain the following:

Provisions for an administrator or a joint board responsible for administering the joint or cooperative undertaking. In the case of a joint board, public agencies party to the agreement shall be represented; and

The manner of acquiring, holding, and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking.

No agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall relieve any public agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law, except that, to the extent of actual and timely performance thereof by a joint board or other legal or administrative entity created by an agreement made hereunder, performance may be offered in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility.

Every agreement made under this section prior to and as a condition precedent to its entry into force shall be submitted to the Attorney General, who shall determine whether the agreement is in proper form and compatible with the laws of this state.

The Attorney General shall approve any agreement submitted to him or her under this section unless he or she finds that it does not meet the conditions set forth in this section and shall detail, in writing addressed to the governing bodies of the public agencies concerned, the specific respects in which the proposed agreement fails to meet the requirements of law.

Failure to disapprove an agreement submitted hereunder within sixty (60) days of its submission shall constitute approval thereof.

Financing of joint projects by agreement shall be as provided by law.

In addition to other specific grants of authority as provided in the Arkansas Constitution and statutes and in addition to the formal cooperation authorized by this chapter, cities, towns, counties, and other units of government are authorized to associate and cooperate with one another on an informal basis without complying with the detailed procedure set out in this section.

In addition to the legal or administrative entities which may otherwise be legally created under Arkansas statutes, public agencies may create a separate legal entity in the form of a public body corporate and politic pursuant to:

Section 25-20-201 et seq. for the purpose of constructing, operating, and maintaining a public library system;

The Consolidated Waterworks Authorization Act, § 25-20-301 et seq., for the purpose of constructing, owning, operating, financing, and maintaining a consolidated waterworks system; or

The Consolidated Wastewater Systems Act, § 25-20-501 et seq., for the purpose of constructing, operating, financing, and maintaining a consolidated wastewater system.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1979, No. 52, § 2, provided that it was the purpose of the act to further authorize and encourage association and cooperation between governmental units which had existed in this state for many years and that the act was necessary for efficient and economical government.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (i)(3) and made related changes.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Public Agencies, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 601.

The action shall be maintained against any public agencies whose default, failure of performance, or other conduct caused or contributed to the incurring of damage or liability by the state.

In the event that an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, shall be submitted to the state officer or agency having the power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by him or her or it as to all matters within his or her or its jurisdiction in the same manner and subject to the same requirements governing the action of the Attorney General pursuant to § 25-20-104(f).

This requirement of submission and approval shall be in addition to and not in substitution for the requirement of submission to and approval by the Attorney General.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 430, § 4; 1979, No. 52, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-904; Acts 1995, No. 813, § 1; 2001, No. 982, § 2; 2009, No. 1371, § 2.

25-20-105. Agreements for joint or cooperative action — Filing — Interstate compacts — Liability for damages.

Prior to its entry into force, an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall be filed with the county clerk and with the Secretary of State.

(1)In the event that an agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter is between or among one (1) or more public agencies of this state and one (1) or more public agencies of another state or of the United States, the agreement shall have the status of an interstate compact, but in any case or controversy involving performance or interpretation thereof or liability thereunder, the public agencies party thereto shall be real parties in interest.

(A)The state may maintain an action to recoup or otherwise make itself whole for any damages or liability which it may incur by reason of being joined as a party therein.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 430, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-905.

25-20-106. Agreements for joint or cooperative action — Submission to and approval by state officer or agency controlling services or facilities.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 430, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-906.

25-20-107. Appropriation of funds — Supplying of personnel or services.

Any public agency entering into an agreement pursuant to this chapter may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, give, or otherwise supply the administrative joint board or other legal or administrative entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking by providing personnel or services therefor which may be within its legal power to furnish.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 430, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-907.

25-20-108. Contract for services from another agency — Requirements — Limitations.

Any one (1) or more public agencies may contract with any one (1) or more other public agencies to perform any governmental service, activity, or undertaking which each of the public agencies entering into the contract is authorized by law to perform alone, provided that the contract shall be authorized by the governing body of each party to the contract. The contract shall set forth fully the purpose, powers, rights, objectives, and responsibilities of the contracting parties.

However, nothing in this chapter authorizes or shall be construed to authorize any public agency to enter into any contract, agreement, or undertaking with any other public agency to purchase, condemn, or otherwise acquire any plant, property, facilities, or business owned or operated by any regulated public utility or pipeline company or to jointly construct or operate any such plant, property, or facility.

Cross References. County libraries, §13-2-401 et seq.

Municipal Libraries and Reading Rooms, §13-2-501 et seq.

Determine that it is in the best interest of the public agency in accomplishing the purposes of this subchapter to create a public body;

Set forth the names of the public agencies which are proposed to form the public body;

Specify any limitations on the exercise of the public body's powers;

Specify the number of directors of the public body, the number of directors required from each public agency, and the voting rights of each director, which number and voting rights may vary by agency and director; and

Approve the filing of an application with the Secretary of State to create the public body corporate and politic.

An application to create a public body corporate and politic shall then be prepared, setting forth:

A request that a public body corporate and politic be created under this subchapter;

The proposed name for the public body;

The names of the participating public agencies;

Any limitations on the exercise of the public body's powers;

The number of directors of the public body;

The number of directors required from each public agency; and

The voting rights of each director.

The application shall be deemed signed and approved by each public agency by attaching thereto a certified copy of the ordinance, resolution, or other action of each participating public agency.

The Secretary of State shall examine the application, and, if the Secretary of State finds that the name proposed for the public body is not identical with that of any other corporation, agency, or instrumentality of this state, so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, or otherwise deceptively misleading, the Secretary of State shall:

Receive and file the application;

Record it in an appropriate book of record in his or her office;

Make and issue a certificate of incorporation under the seal of the state setting forth the names of the participating public agencies; and

Record the certificate in an appropriate book of record in his or her office.

A copy of the certificate of incorporation, certified by the Secretary of State, shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of the public body and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents of the certificate and the effective creation of the public body corporate and politic, absent fraud in the premises being established.

Any application filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter may be amended from time to time with the unanimous consent of the directors of the public body corporate and politic who are entitled to vote.

The amendment shall be signed and filed with the Secretary of State in the manner provided in this section, whereupon the Secretary of State shall make and issue an amendment to the certificate of incorporation.

Each director shall be appointed by the governing body of the public agency which he or she represents, with all vacancies being likewise filled within forty-five (45) days.

(A)The directors shall receive no compensation for their services, but they shall be entitled to reimbursement of expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

No director may serve more than six (6) consecutive years.

Before entering upon their duties, the directors shall take and subscribe to an oath of office swearing to discharge faithfully their duties in the manner provided by law.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The operation of this section may be affected by the enactment of Acts 1995, No. 1211, codified as §25-16-90 et seq.

Apply for and receive permits, licenses, certificates, and approvals as may be necessary and construct, maintain, and operate facilities in accordance therewith;

Employ the services of professionals;

Purchase insurance;

Purchase, receive, own, hold, improve, use, lease, sell, convey, exchange, transfer, assign, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, or deal with, real or personal property or any legal or equitable interest therein in its own name;

Apply for, receive, and use loans, grants, taxes, donations, and contributions from any public agency or other lawful source, including any taxes levied pursuant to any authority granted by the Arkansas Constitution or statutes, and amendments thereto, and any proceeds from the sale of bonds;

Acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property which it may deem necessary for its purposes, in the manner prescribed in §§ 18-15-1202 — 18-15-1207 or in the manner provided by any other statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain; and

Do any and all other acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of and to exercise the powers granted to the public body by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 430, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-908.

Subchapter 2

— Public Bodies Corporate and Politic

25-20-201. Creation.

Any two (2) or more public agencies are hereby authorized to create a public body corporate and politic as a separate legal entity for the purpose of constructing, operating, and maintaining a public library system.

The governing body of each public agency wishing to form a public body corporate and politic shall, by ordinance or resolution, or otherwise pursuant to law, of the governing body of each participating public agency:

History.

Acts 1995, No. 813, § 2.

25-20-202. Board of directors — Executive director.

(1)(A)Each public body corporate and politic shall be administered and governed by a board of directors, with each director residing within the jurisdiction of the public agency which he or she represents.

(1)The board of directors shall appoint a paid executive director, who shall be in charge of the daily operations of the public body and shall be responsible for submitting a budget to the board of directors for approval and the hiring, dismissal, and compensation of other staff.

The board of directors shall have final approval of all budgets.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 813, § 2.

25-20-203. Powers.

Unless its application provides otherwise, each public body shall have the power to:

Have perpetual succession;

Maintain such offices as it may deem appropriate;

Execute and perform contracts;

A public body corporate and politic created as provided by this subchapter shall constitute an independent legal entity, and, notwithstanding any other provision of state law or any ordinance, resolution, or other action of any participating public agency to the contrary, none of the powers granted to a public body under the provisions of this subchapter or in its application for incorporation shall be subject to the further supervision or regulation or require the further approval or consent of any participating public agency.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 813, § 2.

25-20-204. Tax exempt status of property and income.

Each public body corporate and politic created pursuant to this subchapter will be performing functions and will be a public instrumentality of the participating public agencies.

Accordingly, all properties at any time owned by the public body and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the state.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 813, § 2.

25-20-205. Immunity.

This subchapter does not abrogate or in any other manner affect the immunity of the participating public agencies.

Such immunity extends also to any public body corporate and politic created pursuant to this subchapter and to each director thereof.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 813, § 2.

25-20-206. Construction.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its intent and purposes and shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of its purposes. To this end it shall not be necessary to comply with the general provisions of other laws dealing with public facilities, their acquisition, construction, equipping, maintenance, operation, leasing, encumbering, or disposition.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 813, § 2.

25-20-207. Withdrawal.

If any public agency participating in a public body corporate and politic wishes to withdraw therefrom, the governing body of that public agency shall determine by ordinance or resolution, or otherwise pursuant to law, of the governing body, that it is in the best interest of the public agency to withdraw from the public body and give notice thereof to all directors of the public body and to the mayor, county judge, president, chair, or other chief executive of the governing body of each of the other public agencies.

Each such governing body shall have ninety (90) days in which to determine, by ordinance or resolution, or otherwise pursuant to law, of the governing body, whether to dissolve the public body or continue without the withdrawing public agency.

The notice of withdrawal shall become effective upon the earlier of:

The date each public agency participating in the public body makes its determination, as provided in subsection (a) of this section; or

The expiration of ninety (90) days.

Effective Dates. Acts 2001, No. 982, § 3: June 30, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas laws for the operation and management of municipal waterworks are inadequate to accommodate the merger of two (2) or more large municipal waterworks; that a new law is needed to protect the financial and governmental interests of the various municipalities involved in consolidating the various municipal waterworks systems; that the financial savings and economies of scale which are anticipated from the merger will make the consolidation in the best interest of the citizens of the merging municipalities; that the consolidation agreement was achieved through persistent and complex negotiations balancing the various municipal interests involved and it is therefore necessary that the law take effect at a time prescribed by that agreement. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on June 30, 2001.”

Acts 2017, No. 711, § 14: Mar. 27, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., places undue restrictions on water systems; that, in order to satisfy such restrictions, a water system must forego certain undertakings to the detriment of the water system and its customers; and that this act is immediately necessary so that a water system may provide information to its utility partners, other government offices, and certain members of the public in order for the water system to serve its community as efficiently and effectively as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1995, No. 813, § 2.

Subchapter 3

— Consolidated Waterworks Systems

25-20-301. Title.

This subchapter may be referred to and cited as the “Consolidated Waterworks Authorization Act”.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-302. Creation.

Any two (2) or more public agencies entering into an interlocal agreement under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, § 25-20-101 et seq., for the purpose of consolidating their waterworks systems are hereby authorized to create a public body corporate and politic as a separate legal entity for the purpose of constructing, owning, managing, operating, financing, improving, extending, acquiring, reconstructing, equipping, selling, leasing, contracting concerning, dealing in, disposing of, and maintaining the consolidated waterworks system.

The governing body of each public agency wishing to create a public body under this subchapter shall approve, by ordinance or resolution or otherwise pursuant to law, the filing of an application with the Secretary of State to create a public body under this subchapter and approve an interlocal agreement specifying the matters set forth in § 25-20-104. Additionally, the interlocal agreement shall:

Specify any limitations on the exercise of the public body's powers, including such matters, if any, as to which the participating public agencies reserve rights to approve, disapprove, or otherwise participate in any exercise of the public body's powers;

Provide for such reasonable franchise fees, payments in lieu of taxes, or other payments by the public body to the participating public agencies as the public agencies may deem appropriate;

Specify the number of commissioners of the public body, the terms of office of the commissioners, the manner of appointing or electing the commissioners, the residency requirements, if any, applicable to commissioners in addition to those set forth in this subchapter, and the voting rights of each commissioner. The voting rights may vary by commissioner; and

Set forth such other matters, not inconsistent with this subchapter, with respect to the creation and operation of the public body as the participating public agencies may deem necessary or appropriate.

An application to create a public body under this subchapter shall then be prepared, setting forth:

A request that a public body corporate and politic be created under this subchapter;

The proposed name for the public body;

The names of the participating public agencies;

The number of commissioners of the public body;

The manner in which commissioners of the public body will be appointed or elected and the residency requirements, if any, applicable to commissioners in addition to those set forth in this subchapter;

The voting rights of each commissioner;

Special procedures for amending the certificate of incorporation, if any; and

Such other matters, not inconsistent with this subchapter, with respect to the creation and operation of the public body as the participating public agencies may deem necessary or appropriate.

The application shall be signed on behalf of each participating public agency by an authorized official of the public agency.

The Secretary of State shall examine the application and, if the Secretary of State finds that the name proposed for the public body is not identical with that of any other corporation, agency, or instrumentality of this state, so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, or otherwise deceptively misleading, the Secretary of State shall:

Receive and file the application;

Record it in an appropriate book of record in his or her office;

Make and issue a certificate of incorporation under the seal of the state setting forth the name of the public body and the names of the participating public agencies; and

Record the certificate in an appropriate book of record in his or her office.

A copy of the certificate of incorporation, certified by the Secretary of State, shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of the public body and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents of the certificate and the effective creation of the public body under this subchapter, absent fraud in the premises being established.

Any certificate of incorporation issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter may be amended from time to time in the manner provided in the certificate of incorporation then existing or, if the certificate of incorporation does not specify a procedure for its amendment, with the consent of a majority of the commissioners of the public body who are entitled to vote.

The amendment shall be signed by an officer or other authorized person of the public body, who shall certify that the certificate of incorporation has been duly amended in accordance with the procedures of this subchapter and, as applicable, in the manner prescribed in the then-existing certificate of incorporation.

Upon filing of the amendment with the Secretary of State in the manner provided in this section, the Secretary of State shall make and issue an amendment to the certificate of incorporation.

(1)Participating public agencies are authorized to contribute to a public body created under this subchapter such real and personal property of the participating public agencies as the participating public agencies shall deem necessary or appropriate to the ownership and operation of a consolidated waterworks system by the public body.

Contributions of properties under this section shall be upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the participating public agencies may determine to be just and proper, it being within the participating public agencies' discretion to contribute property with or without monetary consideration.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-303. Contributions of public agency properties.

However, any contributions of reserve funds held in trust under §14-73-101 et seq. shall be made on the condition that the funds may be used only for the purposes described in the trust agreement and until so used shall remain in a trust fund complying with the requirements of §14-73-101 et seq.

Participating public agencies shall have the power to execute any and all contracts, leases, deeds, bills of sale, easements, assignments, and other instruments of conveyance as may be required or convenient to exercise the powers granted in this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-304. Board of commissioners.

(1)Each public body created under this subchapter shall have a board of commissioners consisting of at least three (3) commissioners, with each commissioner residing within the jurisdiction of one (1) of the participating public agencies and otherwise meeting any residency requirements set forth in the public body's certificate of incorporation.

Each commissioner shall be appointed or elected in the manner set forth in the public body's certificate of incorporation and shall serve a term of office as specified in the interlocal agreement.

The commissioners shall receive no compensation for their services, but they shall be entitled to reimbursement of expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Before entering upon their duties, the commissioners shall take and file with the Secretary of State an oath of office swearing to discharge faithfully their duties in the manner provided by law.

(1)The board of commissioners shall meet and organize by electing one (1) of their number as chair, one (1) as vice chair, one (1) as secretary, and one (1) as treasurer, and those officers shall be elected annually thereafter in like manner.

The duties of secretary and treasurer may be performed by the same commissioner.

The secretary may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the public body. The secretary may give certificates under the official seal of the public body to the effect that the copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the public body may rely upon the certificates.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-305. Powers and duties of board of commissioners.

All powers of any public body created under this subchapter shall be exercised by, or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the public body managed under the direction of, its board of commissioners, subject to any limitation set forth in the public body's certificate of incorporation or interlocal agreement. The duties of the board of commissioners shall include, but not be limited to:

Appointing a chief executive officer, who shall not be a member of the board of commissioners, and shall set compensation and other terms of employment for the chief executive officer;

Approving all budgets of the public entity;

Adopting such rules and bylaws as the board of commissioners may deem necessary and expedient for the proper ownership and operation of the consolidated waterworks system, and altering, changing, or amending the rules and bylaws at its discretion; and

Performing such other duties as shall be set forth in the interlocal agreement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” twice in (3).

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2929.